Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 6 Warrants for Arrest

12-6-1.
Examination on complaint of commission of offense.

Whenever any complaint shall be made to any judge of the district court, or to any justice of the peace authorized to issue warrants within a division of the district court, of the commission of any offense within the division, he or she shall examine the complainant under oath or affirmation and require the complainant’s statements to be reduced to writing and be subscribed and sworn to by the person or persons making them.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 158; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

12-6-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 17; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 15.

12-6-2.
Recognizance for cost on complaint within trial jurisdiction of district court.

Whenever any complaint shall allege the commission of any offense within the jurisdiction of the district court to try and determine, the judge or justice of the peace shall require the complainant, unless he or she is exempted by law, to enter into a like recognizance as is required when complaint is made for any threat.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 159; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

12-6-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 17.

12-6-3.
Surety for costs on complaint beyond trial jurisdiction of district court.

The judge or justice of the peace may, in all cases of complaint to any of them of the commission of any crime or offense which the district court has not jurisdiction to try and determine, before issuing any warrant on the complaint, require of the complainant surety for costs, as is required in cases which the court has jurisdiction to try and determine.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 160; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

12-6-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 17.

12-6-4.
Issuance of warrant.

Upon the giving of a recognizance with surety, in the case where surety is required, and upon the giving of a recognizance without surety, where no surety is required, and upon the making of a complaint only where no recognizance is required, the judge or justice of the peace, if in his or her opinion there is probable cause to believe that an offense has been committed and that defendant has committed it, shall immediately issue his or her warrant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 161; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

12-6-4

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 15.

Form of Warrant.

A warrant is valid though it does not contain the defendant’s name if it is preceded on the same paper by the complaint which states the defendant’s name and residence and if the warrant incorporates the complaint by reference. State v. Goyette,

11 R.I. 592

,

1877 R.I. LEXIS 55

(1877).

A warrant should be under the seal of the justice or clerk who issues it and not under the seal of the court to which it is returnable. State v. Goyette,

11 R.I. 592

,

1877 R.I. LEXIS 55

(1877).

A warrant returnable “before me” or “some other lawful authority,” while formally irregular, was not fatally defective. State v. Sherman,

16 R.I. 631

, 18 A. 1040,

1889 R.I. LEXIS 77

(1889).

12-6-5.
Recognizance not required on official complaints.

Whenever any agent of the children’s friend and service shall make complaint against any person for any of the offenses mentioned in §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-8

; or whenever any agent of the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall make any complaint against any person for any of the offenses mentioned in chapter 1 of title 4; or whenever the director of public welfare of any city or town shall make complaint against any person for the violation of any of the provisions contained in chapter 8 of title 15; or whenever the director or an agent of the department of labor and training, specifically designated for the purpose, shall make a complaint against any person for any of the offenses mentioned in chapters 3, 12, 14 and chapters 29 — 38 of title 28; or whenever the director or an agent of the department of human services, duly appointed for that purpose, or the director of any state institution appointed by the director of human services, or the superintendent of the Rhode Island training school for youth, or the warden of the adult correctional institutions shall make complaint against any person under any law governing the state department of human services, that director, agent, or officer shall not be required to enter into recognizance for costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 162; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 15; P.L. 1930, ch. 1569, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1774, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. P.L. 1950, ch. 2416, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-6-5

; P.L. 1986, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 101, § 6; P.L. 1994, ch. 401, § 7.

12-6-6.
Surety for costs not required of police officers.

Whenever any complaint shall be made by the sheriff or any deputy sheriff of any county, or by any member of the division of state police, any member of the campus police forces at the state colleges or universities, or any conservation officer of the department of environmental management, or by the chief of police, deputy chief of police, commander, captain, police inspector, or other member of the police force, or town sergeant of any city or town, within any division of the district court, to the judge of the district court or to any justice of the peace authorized to issue warrants in the division, against any person for any criminal offense committed within the division, the sheriff, deputy sheriff, member of the division of state police, member of the campus police forces at the state colleges or universities, conservation officer of the department of environmental management, chief of police, deputy chief of police, commander, captain, police inspector or other member of the police force, or city or town sergeant shall not be required to give surety for costs, but shall give his or her personal recognizance and be liable in his or her individual capacity for the costs.

In addition to the officials specified in subsection (a) of this section, the following persons shall be subject to its provisions:

Police sergeants, lieutenants, and detectives in the town of Bristol;

All members of the town of Barrington police force above the rank of patrol officer;

A police sergeant or his or her superior in the town of Johnston;

Police lieutenants and sergeants in the city of Cranston;

Any police lieutenant or police sergeant in the town of Coventry;

Any police lieutenant in the town of North Kingstown;

All members of the town of Lincoln police force above the rank of patrol officer;

Police lieutenants, detective sergeants, and sergeants in the town of Westerly;

All members of the town of Portsmouth police force above the rank of patrol officer;

All members of the town of Burrillville police force above the rank of patrol officer;

All members of the town of Glocester police force above the rank of patrol officer;

All members of the town of Scituate police force above the rank of patrol officer;

All members of the town of Middletown police force above the rank of patrol officer;

All lieutenants and detective sergeants of the town of South Kingstown police force;

Police sergeants in the town of Warren;

Police sergeants and lieutenants in the city of Woonsocket;

A police sergeant or his or her superior in the town of Foster;

All members of the town of Hopkinton police force above the rank of patrol officer;

All members of the campus police force at the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, or the Community College of Rhode Island, above the rank of campus police officer;

A police sergeant, the town sergeant or any officer of higher rank in the town of New Shoreham;

All members of the town of Cumberland police force above the rank of patrol officer;

Any police sergeant or his or her superior in the town of Charlestown;

A police sergeant or his or her superior in the town of North Smithfield;

All members of the town of East Greenwich police force above the rank of patrol officer;

All members of the Richmond police department, designated by the chief of police;

All lieutenants of the city of East Providence police department;

All investigators of the department of attorney general appointed pursuant to §

42-9-8.1

;

All members of the town of West Greenwich police force above the rank of corporal;

All inspectors and agents of the Rhode Island state fugitive task force appointed pursuant to §

12-6-7.2

; and

All members of the Rhode Island airport police department at or above the rank of inspector.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 163; P.L. 1906, ch. 1336, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 16; P.L. 1925, ch. 588, § 14; P.L. 1932, ch. 1901, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

12-6-6

; P.L. 1967, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 17; P.L. 1976, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 75, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 283, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 462, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 501, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 364, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 286, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 423, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 74, § 2.

Form of Complaint and Warrant.

Complaint and warrant which referred to the arresting traffic officer as “of the RI State Police” instead of as a “member of the division of state police” was not defective where correct designation appeared on cover of the complaint, so as to prevent the state from obtaining its exemption from providing surety. State v. Perry,

112 R.I. 719

, 315 A.2d 60,

1974 R.I. LEXIS 1495

(1974).

12-6-6.1 — 12-6-6.14.
[Superseded.]

12-6-7.
Warrants issued to other divisions.

Whenever any judge of the district court, or any justice of the peace, shall issue his or her warrant against any person charged with an offense committed in a division of the district court, and the person so charged shall escape into, reside, or be in any other county than the one in which the division is, the judge or justice of the peace may direct his or her warrant to each and all deputy sheriffs, city or town sergeants, and town constables within the state, requiring them to apprehend the person and bring him or her before the division of the district court having jurisdiction of the offense, to be dealt with according to law; the officers shall obey and execute the warrant, and be protected from obstruction and assault in executing the warrant as in service of other process.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 174; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

12-6-7

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 17; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 43; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 21; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 21.

12-6-7.1.
Service of arrest warrants.

Whenever any judge of any court shall issue his or her warrant against any person for failure to appear or comply with a court order, or for failure to make payment of a court ordered fine, civil assessment, or order of restitution, the judge may direct the warrant to each and all deputy sheriffs, the warrant squad, or any peace officer as defined in §

12-7-21

, requiring them to apprehend the person and bring him or her before the court to be dealt with according to law; and the officers shall obey and execute the warrant, and be protected from obstruction and assault in executing the warrant as in service of other process. The person apprehended shall, in addition to any other costs incurred by him or her, be ordered to pay a fee for service of this warrant in the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125). Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of the above fee collected as a result of a warrant squad arrest shall be divided among the local law enforcement agencies assigned to the warrant squad. Any person apprehended on a warrant for failure to appear for a cost review hearing in the superior court may be released upon posting with a justice of the peace the full amount due and owing in court costs as described in the warrant or bail in an other amount or form that will ensure the defendant’s appearance in the superior court at an ability to pay hearing, in addition to the one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) warrant assessment fee described above. Any person detained as a result of the actions of the justice of the peace in acting upon the superior court cost warrant shall be brought before the superior court at its next session. Such monies shall be delivered by the justice of the peace to the court issuing the warrant on the next court business day.

Any person arrested pursuant to a warrant issued by a municipal court may be presented to a judge of the district court, or a justice of the peace authorized to issue warrants pursuant to §

12-10-2

, for release on personal recognizance or bail when the municipal court is not in session. The provisions of this section shall apply only to criminal and not civil cases pending before the courts.

Any person arrested pursuant to a warrant issued hereunder shall:

be immediately brought before the court;

if the court is not in session then the person shall be brought before the court at its next session;

be afforded a review hearing on his/her ability to pay within forty-eight (48) hours; and

if the court is not in session at the time of the arrest, a review hearing on his/her ability to pay will be provided at the time for the first court appearance, as set forth in subsection (c)(3) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 33, § 1; 1996, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 43.

12-6-7.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 195 § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 423, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 40; P.L. 1996, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 32, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 29, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 7, § 5.

12-6-8.
Taxing and execution for costs on discharge of respondent.

Whenever any complaint shall be tried before a district court in which the complainant is required to recognize with surety, and the respondent is discharged, the district court shall immediately tax all the costs for which the complainant is liable; and if the costs are not paid within ten (10) days, execution for the costs shall issue against the complainant and his or her surety returnable in twenty (20) days from the date of execution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 164; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

12-6-8

.